Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-963
Violations; penalty; county attorney; duties.

(1) Any person who intrudes upon any land under quarantine, who moves or causes to be moved any article covered by section 2-957 except as provided in such section, who prevents or threatens to prevent entry upon land as provided in section 2-961, or who interferes with the carrying out of the Noxious Weed Control Act shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor in addition to any penalty imposed pursuant to section 2-955.

(2) It shall be the duty of the county attorney of the county in which any violation of section 2-955 or this section occurs, when notified of such violation by the county board or control authority, to cause appropriate proceedings to be instituted and pursued in the appropriate court without delay.

Laws 1965, c. 7, § 12, p. 86;

Laws 1974, LB 694, § 2;

Laws 1975, LB 14, § 9;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 5;

Laws 1983, LB 154, § 2;

Laws 1987, LB 1, § 7;

Laws 1987, LB 138, § 12;

Laws 1989, LB 49, § 13.